Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
507D

NONCONSENSUAL
COMMON LAW LIENS AND FRIVOLOUS

FINANCING
STATEMENTS

Section

507D-1 Findings and purpose

507D-2 Definitions

507D-3 Scope of chapter

507D-4 Contesting validity of recorded
instruments;

injunctions

507D-5 Requirement of certified court order

507D-6 Filing a notice of invalid lien

507D-7 Expungement of invalid lien; penalties;
sanctions for

frivolous filings

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2002, c 145, §2.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next